South Dakota, session 2026, SB118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
On or before January thirty-first of each year, the treasurer shall deposit in the
homeowner tax reduction fund, as created in Senate Bill 125, and enacted by the One
Hundred First Legislature, the greater of one hundred million dollars, or the applicable
percent of taxes collected in the previous year pursuant to:
(1) Chapter 10-45;
(2) Chapter 10-46;
(3) Chapter 10-46E; and
(4) Chapter 10-58.
If Senate Bill 125 does not become effective, the state treasurer may not transfer
moneys under this section.
For purposes of this section, "applicable percent" means three-tenths percent
divided by the tax rate provided for the taxes referenced in subdivisions (1) to (4),
inclusive, of this section, as applicable.
Section 2. That § 10-46-48 be AMENDED:
10-46-48. All revenue arising under the operation of this chapter shall
immediately be turned over to the state treasurer and by him credited to the general fund,
except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. That § 10-46E-9 be AMENDED:
10-46E-9. The revenue from the tax imposed by this chapter shall be deposited
in the general fund, except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this Act.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.197.42 2 118
Section 4. That § 10-58-5 be AMENDED:
10-58-5. The tax generated by this chapter must be deposited in the general fund,
except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this Act.
Section 5. This Act is effective beginning July 1, 2027.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.